test/contrib/Analyzers/Hunspell/Dictionaries/nl_NL.aff
SET ISO8859-1
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwjkqxz-ëéèêïîäàâöüû'ESIANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWJKQXZ

NOSPLITSUGS

PFX A Y 1
PFX A 0 aan .

PFX B Y 1
PFX B 0 be .

PFX C Y 1
PFX C 0 in .

PFX F Y 1
PFX F 0 af .

PFX G Y 1
PFX G 0 ge .

PFX K Y 1
PFX K 0 op .

PFX O Y 1
PFX O 0 on .

PFX U Y 1
PFX U 0 uit .

PFX V Y 1
PFX V 0 ver .

SFX J N 18
SFX J 0 tje [aeiou][aeiou] 
SFX J 0 tjes [aeiou][aeiou] 
SFX J 0 atje [^aeiou]a 
SFX J 0 atjes [^aeiou]a 
SFX J 0 etje [^aeiou]i 
SFX J 0 etjes [^aeiou]i 
SFX J 0 'tje [^aeiou]y
SFX J 0 'tjes [^aeiou]y 
SFX J 0 otje [^aeiou]o
SFX J 0 otjes [^aeiou]o 
SFX J 0 utje [^aeiou]u
SFX J 0 utjes [^aeiou]u 
SFX J 0 tje [aeiou][lnrw] 
SFX J 0 tjes [aeiou][lnrw] 
SFX J 0 pje [aeiou][m] 
SFX J 0 pjes [aeiou][m] 
SFX J 0 je [aeiou][bcdfgkpt] 
SFX J 0 jes [aeiou][bcdfgkpt] 

SFX N N 2
SFX N 0 en [^e]
SFX N 0 n e

SFX M N 13
SFX M 0 ben b
SFX M 0 den d
SFX M 0 fen f
SFX M 0 gen g
SFX M 0 ken k
SFX M 0 len l
SFX M 0 men m
SFX M 0 nen n
SFX M 0 pen p
SFX M 0 ren r
SFX M 0 sen s
SFX M 0 ten t
SFX M z zen z

SFX Z N 20
SFX Z af ven aaf
SFX Z as zen aas
SFX Z ef ven eef
SFX Z es zen ees
SFX Z s zen eis
SFX Z s zen eus
SFX Z f ven ief
SFX Z s zen ies
SFX Z f ven ijf
SFX Z s zen ijs
SFX Z f ven oef
SFX Z s zen oes
SFX Z of ven oof
SFX Z os zen oos
SFX Z f ven uif
SFX Z s zen uis
SFX Z us zen uus
SFX Z f ven [^aeijou]f
SFX Z s zen [^aeijou]s
SFX Z id den heid

SFX P N 34
SFX P ad den aad
SFX P af fen aaf
SFX P ag gen aag
SFX P ak ken aak
SFX P al len aal
SFX P am men aam
SFX P an nen aan
SFX P ap pen aap
SFX P ar ren aar
SFX P as sen aas
SFX P at ten aat
SFX P ed den eed
SFX P eg gen eeg
SFX P ek ken eek
SFX P el len eel
SFX P em men eem
SFX P en nen een
SFX P ep pen eep
SFX P er ren eer
SFX P es sen ees
SFX P et ten eet
SFX P od den ood
SFX P of fen oof
SFX P og gen oog
SFX P ok ken ook
SFX P ol len ool
SFX P om men oom
SFX P on nen oon
SFX P op pen oop
SFX P or ren oor
SFX P ot ten oot
SFX P ul len uul
SFX P un nen uun
SFX P ur ren uur

SFX S N 1
SFX S 0 s [^s]

SFX X N 1
SFX X 0 's [^s]

SFX E N 1
SFX E 0 e [^e]

SFX R N 4
SFX R 0 r e
SFX R 0 er [^e]
SFX R 0 re e
SFX R 0 ere [^e]

SFX T N 2
SFX T 0 st .
SFX T 0 ste .

SFX D N 2
SFX D 0 d [^d]
SFX D 0 de [^d]

SFX W N 7
SFX W 0 t [^t]
SFX W 0 te [kfstp]
SFX W 0 ten [kfstp]
SFX W 0 te ch
SFX W 0 ten ch
SFX W 0 de [^kfstp]
SFX W 0 den [^kfstp]

SFX H N 1
SFX H 0 heid .

SFX I N 1
SFX I 0 ing .

REP 165
REP g ch
REP ch g
REP cht gd
REP gg ch
REP ei ij
REP ij ei
REP y ij
REP u ij
REP e ij
REP ie y
REP ie y'
REP ï ii
REP ee é
REP é ee
REP ee ë
REP ae ë
REP je ë
REP eë e-e
REP o eau
REP o's eaus
REP oo eau
REP ok eauc
REP joe u
REP ui eu
REP iu uï
REP ies isch
REP s sch
REP ss zz
REP c ss
REP z ss
REP x ks
REP ks x
REP kt x
REP ks ct
REP ks cz
REP x cz
REP ed t
REP k qu
REP kw qu
REP kw cqu
REP qu k
REP qu kw
REP kwie cui
REP kwie cuit
REP que k
REP ph f
REP ff v
REP ks cc
REP kk cc
REP cc kk
REP k cc
REP ele elli
REP ove oof
REP ool ole
REP age aag
REP lli lj
REP aj aill
REP lj ill
REP lis lliss
REP alie aille
REP nj gn
REP oer oure
REP ouqu oek
REP oe out
REP cou koe
REP ique iek
REP e ai
REP eks ax
REP tens tigens
REP g gge
REP de dede
REP ing iging
REP rres ress
REP bbon bonn
REP scus cuss
REP rondis rrondiss
REP abber aberr
REP ggres gress
REP acoll accol
REP plaudis pplaudiss
REP lluminim lumini
REP len llenn
REP ttel tell
REP acab abrac
REP ubi ibu
REP croc krok 
REP ten than
REP uuk uc
REP ings ens
REP ens ings
REP eid ijdt
REP ters teress
REP iep ype
REP sen sciën
REP sens sciënt
REP kons conc
REP konsekw consequ
REP akkom accomm
REP statie staatsie
REP glij gelei
REP noot note
REP knoot cnote
REP usqu uusk
REP kass caiss
REP akel acle
REP crash krach
REP gynek gynaec
REP gine gynae
REP music muzik
REP kiet quitte
REP ruggegraad ruggengraat
REP zowiezo sowieso
REP ceedee cd
REP ceedees cd's
REP grafitti graffiti
REP kangaroe kangoeroe
REP kassiere caissière
REP britanië Brittannië
REP britanie Brittannië
REP capucino cappuccino
REP celcius Celsius 
REP kado cadeau
REP kado's cadeaus
REP kadootje cadeautje
REP comittee comité
REP committee comité
REP komitee comité 
REP komittee comité 
REP kommitee comité 
REP kommittee comité
REP kwis quiz 
REP kwissen quizzen
REP loupe loep
REP copy kopij
REP pitoresque pittoreske 
REP reikweite reikwijdte
REP snietsel schnitzel
REP snitsel schnitzel
REP spagetie spaghetti
REP spagettie spaghetti
REP lazanja lasagne
REP attack attaque
REP uptodate up-to-date
REP caffeine cafeïne
REP enigsinds enigszins
REP klup club
REP wiskid whizzkid 
REP kontakt contact 
REP kontekst context 
REP korrekt correct 
REP kritikus criticus
REP gestressed gestrest
REP zoëven zo-even
REP dislek dyslec
REP dislektie dyslexie
REP disleksie dyslexie
REP dyslecten dyslectici
REP dyslect dyslecticus
REP dislekties dyslectisch
REP dyslexties dyslectisch
REP spel spelling
REP spelcheck spellingcontrole
REP spellingcheck spellingcontrole
REP spellingscheck spellingcontrole
REP aflassen afgelasten
